California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 days of the meeting, and deposits thereafter shall be based upon the applicable amount handled during the ensuing periods of 20 racing days, with the last deposit being based upon the applicable amount handled from the end of the last 20-racing-day period for which a deposit has been made to the end of the meeting.

(c) After deducting a sum up to, but not to exceed, 10 percent of the total deposits made pursuant to subdivision (b) and the total deposits made pursuant to other provisions of this chapter, including Sections 19612.1, 19612.2, 19614.2, 19616, and 19616.1, to compensate the official registering agency for its administrative costs, the official registering agency shall distribute annually the balance of the deposits in the following manner:

(1) Sixty percent to the breeder fund from which breeder premiums are to be paid.

(2) Twenty-five percent to the owner fund from which owners’ premiums are to be paid.

(3) Fifteen percent to the stallion fund from which stallion awards are to be paid.

(d) The official registering agency shall make the following payments to the breeder, owner, and stallion owner to encourage agriculture and the breeding of high quality horses in this state:

(1) The breeder shall be paid a sum based on a prorated share, but not less than 10 percent, of first and second place earnings from qualified races by a California-bred paint horse. If the sum paid to the breeder is less than 10 percent of the purse paid for a first or second place finish in a qualifying race, the owners’ award and stallion award pools shall respectively contribute 62.5 percent and 37.5
 percent of the moneys necessary to the breeder premium pool to raise the breeder premium to 10 percent minimum. In calculating the 10 percent breeder premium, the maximum purse considered earned in any qualifying race within this state is two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for a first place finish, and eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) for a second place finish.

(2) The owner shall be paid an owners’ award, a sum based on a prorated share of first and second place earnings from qualified races by a California-bred paint horse.

(3) The stallion owner shall be paid a stallion award, a sum based on a prorated share of first and second place earnings from qualified races by a California-bred paint horse. Stallion awards shall not be made to the owner of a sire that has been out of the state for breeding purposes during the calendar year.

(4) The breeder premium and owners’ and stallion awards shall be paid not later than March 31 of the calendar year immediately following the calendar year for which the awards or premiums were earned. Any payments for awards or premiums that are uncashed on December 31 of the year issued shall accrue to the following year for distribution on an equal basis.

(e) The amount remaining for distribution under this section, if any, after the payments are made under subdivision (d) shall be used for the payment of paint horse breeders premiums and owners’ and stallion awards on a prorated percentage based on the win and second place shares of the purse exclusive of all purse money not derived from the parimutuel pools, to the breeders, owners, and owners of sires of paint horses who have been officially placed first or second in one or more qualifying races.

(f) If there are insufficient funds to make all of the distributions in this section, there shall be no assessments made against any association to fund the deficiencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 282, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19617.4.

(a) The official registering agency shall invest the funds deposited with it, and the interest earned on those deposits shall be a part of the total deposits distributable under subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 19617.2.

(b) In the event there are insufficient funds to make the distributions described in Section 19617.2, there shall be no additional assessments made against any association or the state to fund the deficiencies.

(c) Any award or premium remaining uncollected for two consecutive years from
 that date of disbursement shall be deemed null and void. The official registering agency shall deposit the amount of the uncollected award or premium into the breeder fund existing at that time.

(d) Any dispute with respect to a breeder award, owner premium, or stallion award shall be decided by the official registering agency, which may demand and inspect any registration certificate or record, or require the submission of claims forms, affidavits, and declarations or make that inspection and require submissions of that information. The decision of the official registering agency shall be subject to review by the board pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) A decision made by the official registering agency with respect to a breeder award, owner premium, or stallion award may be appealed to the board. The appeal shall be submitted in writing to the board in such manner and at such time
 as to permit the board, in the exercise of reasonable diligence, to determine the appeal prior to the time at which distribution of that award or premium is to be made. The board’s decision on this matter shall be final and binding upon all parties.

(f) The official registering agency shall report annually to the board, which in turn shall report annually to the Governor and Legislature, with respect to the funds deposited pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19617.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1019, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

19617.5.

(a) Any association conducting a quarter horse or harness racing meeting shall pay the sums required to be paid by Section 19567 out of the amounts deducted from the parimutuel pool for license fees, commissions, and purses in the same proportion as the distribution of the license fees, commissions, and purses.

Those sums deducted for quarter horse meetings shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.7 and shall thereafter be distributed in
 accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 19617.7.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any association conducting a fair racing meeting other than a harness meeting or conducting a mixed breed meeting shall deduct an additional 0.34 of 1 percent of the total amount handled in its daily conventional and exotic parimutuel pools for all races for payment of breeder and stallion awards provided for in this chapter. Following the close of the meeting, the respective official registering agency or officially recognized horsemen’s organization shall distribute the amounts so deducted as follows:

(1) With respect to thoroughbred races, the amounts deducted shall be paid as breeder awards, owners’ premiums, and stallion awards as provided in Section 19617.2.

(2) With respect to quarter horse races, the
 amounts deducted shall be paid as breeder premiums, and owners’ and stallion awards, as provided in Section 19617.7.

(3) With respect to Arabian races, the amounts deducted shall be paid as breeder premiums, and owners’ and stallion awards as provided in Section 19617.8.

(4) With respect to Appaloosa races, the amounts deducted shall be paid as breeder premiums, and owners’ and stallion awards, as provided in Section 19617.9.

(5) With respect to paint horse races, the amounts deducted shall be paid as breeder and owners’ premiums, and stallion awards, as provided in Section 19617.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

19617.6.

(a) Since the purpose of this chapter is to encourage agriculture and the breeding of horses in this state, a sum equal to 10 percent of the first money of each purse won by a registered California-bred horse at a harness racing meeting shall be paid by the licensee conducting the meeting to the owner of the horse. This section applies to any California-bred standardbred horse for all races except the California Standardbred Sires Stakes races, other stakes races designed for California-bred standardbred horses, and late closing events and
 series conducted at the harness racing meetings in California.

(b) Each licensee conducting a harness race meeting shall pay the sums required to be paid in subdivision (a) out of the amount deducted for purses pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19612, Section 19612.6, and subdivision (d) of Section 19616.1.

(c) Funds paid to owners of California-bred standardbred horses pursuant to this section shall be distributed by the licensed harness racing association no later than 30 calendar days after the conclusion of the racing meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 12, Sec. 2.   Effective April 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19617.7.

(a) The following definitions govern the construction of this section:

(1) “Breeder” means a person who is registered as the breeder of a California-bred quarter horse with the official registering agency and is named on the applicable Certificate of Registration issued by the American Quarter Horse Association.

(2) “Eligible earnings” means the following:

(A) In the case of breeder premiums, the annual amount earned by a California-bred quarter horse for finishing first or second in qualifying races.

(B) In the case of owners’ awards, the annual amount earned by a California-bred quarter horse for finishing first or second in qualifying races.

(C) In the case of stallion awards, the annual amount earned by California-conceived or California-bred foals of an eligible quarter horse sire for finishing first or second in qualifying races.

(D) In order for earnings from a qualifying race to be considered as eligible earnings, a California-bred quarter horse shall be registered as such with the official registering agency before the entries were taken by the association for the qualifying race in which that horse earned purse money.

(E) For purposes of this paragraph, the maximum purse considered earned in any qualifying race within this state is two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for a win, and eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) for a second place finish.

(F) In determining the purse earned in any qualifying race that is a stakes race, the amount earned shall be based on the added money and other sources of the purse, such as nomination, entry, or starting fees, bonuses, and sponsor contributions, or any combination thereof.

(G) On or before February 1 of any year, the stallion owner shall verify with the official registering agency the eligibility of a stallion to receive the stallion award to which the owner is entitled.

(3) “Eligible quarter horse sire” means a quarter horse,
 or thoroughbred stallion, bred to a quarter horse mare, where the sire was continuously present in this state from February 1 to July 15, inclusive, of the calendar year in which the qualifying race was conducted, as well as from February 1 to July 15, inclusive, of the following calender year. If a sire dies in this state and stood his last season at stud in this state, he shall thereafter continue to be considered an eligible quarter horse sire. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a quarter horse or thoroughbred stallion shall be considered an eligible quarter horse sire only if its owner has verified the stallion’s eligibility with the official registering agency for stallion awards on or before February 1 of the calendar year immediately following the calendar year for which the awards are being distributed.

(4) “Official registering agency” means the Pacific Coast Quarter Horse Racing Association.

(5) “Owner” means the person who is registered with the paymaster of purses on the date the qualifying race was conducted as the owner of the California-bred quarter horse earning purse money in that race.

(6) “Qualifying race” means all quarter horse races in this state.

(7) “Stallion owner” means the person who is the owner of the eligible quarter horse sire as of December 31 of the calendar year in which that sire’s foals had eligible earnings or the person who owned the eligible quarter horse sire on the date that the sire died.

(b) Any association conducting a race meeting that includes quarter horse racing shall deposit with the official registering agency 0.2 of 1 percent of the total amount handled ontrack, and 0.4 of 1 percent of the total amount
 handled offtrack, in daily conventional and exotic parimutuel pools and a sum equal to 25 percent of those funds specified for purses in Sections 19612.1, 19612.2, 19614.2, 19616, and 19616.1 and the sums specified in Sections 19567 and 19617.5, resulting from quarter horse racing. The deposits shall be made at the following intervals:

(1) For any meeting of 20 racing days or less, the requisite deposit shall be made not later than seven days immediately following the last day of that meeting.

(2) For any meeting of more than 20 racing days, the initial deposit shall be made not later than 27 racing days after the commencement of that meeting and every 20 racing days thereafter, with a final deposit made not later than seven days following the last day of that meeting. The initial deposit for that meeting shall be based upon the applicable amount handled during the first 20 racing
 days of the meeting and deposits thereafter shall be based upon the applicable amount handled during the ensuing periods of 20 racing days with the last deposit being based upon the applicable amount handled from the end of the last 20-racing-day period for which a deposit has been made to the end of the meeting.

(c) After deducting a sum up to, but not to exceed, 10 percent of the total deposits made pursuant to subdivision (b) and the total deposits made pursuant to other provisions of this chapter, including Sections 19612.1, 19612.2, 19614.2, 19616, and 19616.1, to compensate the official registering agency for its administrative costs, the official registering agency shall distribute annually the balance of the deposits in the following manner:

(1) Sixty percent to the breeder fund from which breeder premiums are to be paid.

(2) Twenty-five percent to the owner fund from which owners’ awards are to be paid.

(3) Fifteen percent to the stallion fund from which stallion awards are to be paid.

(d) The official registering agency shall make the following payments to the breeder, owner, and stallion owner to encourage agriculture and the breeding of high quality horses in this state:

(1) The breeder shall be paid a sum based on a prorated share, but not less than 10 percent, of first and second place earnings from qualified races by a California-bred quarter horse.

If the sum paid to the breeder is less than 10 percent of the purse paid for a first or second place finish in a qualifying race, the owners’ award and stallion award pools shall respectively contribute 62.5 percent and 37.5
 percent of the moneys necessary to the breeder premium pool to raise the breeder premium to 10 percent minimum. In calculating the 10 percent breeder premium, the maximum purse considered earned in any qualifying race within this state is two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for a first place finish, and eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) for a second place finish.

(2) The owner shall be paid an owners’ award, a sum based on a prorated share of first and second place earnings from qualified races by a California-bred quarter horse.

(3) The stallion owner shall be paid a stallion award, a sum based on a prorated share of first and second place earnings from qualified races by a California-bred quarter horse.

Stallion awards shall not be made to the owner of a sire that has been out of the state for breeding purposes during the calendar
 year.

(4) The breeder premium, and owners’ and stallion awards shall be paid not later than March 31 of the calendar year immediately following the calendar year for which the awards or premiums were earned. Any payments for awards or premiums that are uncashed on December 31 of the year issued, shall accrue to the following year for distribution on an equal basis. All uncashed payments for premiums and awards that have accumulated as of December 31, 1994, shall be paid to the 1995 awards program in accordance with subdivision (c).

(e) The amount remaining for distribution under this section, if any, after the payments are made under subdivision (d) shall be used for the payment of quarter horse breeder premiums and owners’ and stallion awards on a prorated percentage based on the win and second place shares of the purse, exclusive of all purse money not derived from the
 parimutuel pools, to the breeders, owners, and owners of sires of quarter horses who have been officially placed first or second in one or more qualifying races.

(f) If there are insufficient funds to make all of the distributions in this section, there shall be no assessments made against any association to fund the deficiencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 32, Sec. 1.   Effective May 5, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19617.75.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the breeding and ownership of quarter horses for racing is an industry that has proven to be beneficial to the welfare of the state’s economic growth. The Legislature further finds and declares that an annual California-bred Quarter Horses Championship races program will further expand and improve the quality of mares bred to California stallions and promote ownership of quality breeding stock in the State of California, which thereby will establish a foundation for expanded investment in this great
 industry.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that in addition to the awards, premiums, and payments provided for in Section 19617.7, the official registering agency for quarter horses shall establish a separate, segregated account for the deposit of funds distributed to it pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 19605.7 and subdivision (c) of Section 19605.71. Moneys in this fund shall be used to supplement purses in the annual California-bred Quarter Horse Championship races, to be established pursuant to regulation of the California Horse Racing Board. The distribution of these purse moneys among these races shall be made pursuant to mutual agreement between the quarter horse association and the registering agency. On June 1 of each year, the official registering agency shall provide the board with an annual report accounting for the current and projected balance of this separate fund. Furthermore, it is the intent of the Legislature that
 the authorization for this fund be retroactive from June 1, 2000, so as to enable the running of the 2001 California-bred Quarter Horse Championship races.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 65, Sec. 3.   Effective July 16, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19617.8.

(a) The following definitions govern the construction of this section:

(1) “Breeder” means the person or persons listed as breeder of record by the Arabian Horse Registry of America and so indicated on the horse’s registration papers.

(2) “Eligible earnings” means the following:

(A) In the case of breeder premiums, the annual amount earned by a California-bred Arabian
 horse for finishing first or second in qualifying races.

(B) In the case of owners’ awards, the annual amount earned by a California-bred Arabian horse for finishing first or second in qualifying races.

(C) In the case of stallion awards, the annual amount earned by California-bred Arabian foals of an eligible Arabian horse sire for finishing first or second in qualifying races.

(D) In order for earnings from a qualifying race to be considered as eligible earnings, an Arabian horse shall be registered as a California-bred horse with the official registering agency before the date entries were taken by the association for the qualifying race in which that horse earned purse money.

(E) In determining the purse earned in any race that is a stakes race, the
 amount earned shall be based on the added money, with no consideration given to other sources of the purse, such as nomination, entry, or starting fees, bonuses, and sponsor contributions, or any combination thereof.

(F) On or before February 15 of any year, the stallion owner shall advise the official registering agency of any and all purses earned during the preceding year to be considered in determining the amount of the stallion award to which the owner is entitled.

(3) “Eligible Arabian sire” means an Arabian stallion that was continuously present in this state for the calendar year in which the qualifying race was conducted. If a sire dies in this state and stood his last season at stud in this state, he shall thereafter continue to be considered an eligible Arabian sire. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an Arabian or stallion shall be considered an eligible
 Arabian sire only if its owner has registered the stallion with the official registering agency for the stallion awards on or before February 15 of the calendar year immediately following the calendar year for which the awards are being distributed. Stallion claim forms are due February 15, whether or not the official registering agency solicits them.

(4) “Official registering agency” means the officially recognized organization representing Arabian horsemen designated by the board.

(5) “Owner” means the person who is registered with the paymaster of purses on the date the qualifying race was conducted as the owner of the California-bred Arabian horse earning purse money in that race.

(6) “Qualifying race” means all Arabian horseraces in this state.

(7) “Stallion owner” means the person who is the owner of the eligible Arabian sire as of December 31 of the calendar year in which that sire’s foals had eligible earnings or the person who owned the eligible Arabian sire on the date that the sire died.

(b) Any association conducting a race meeting that includes Arabian horseracing shall deposit with the official registering agency 0.2 of 1 percent of the total amount handled ontrack, and 0.4 of 1 percent of the total amount handled offtrack, in daily conventional and exotic parimutuel pools and a sum equal to 13.33 percent of those funds specified for purses in Section 19612.1 and the sums specified in Sections 19567 and 19617.5, resulting from Arabian horseracing. The deposits shall be made at the following intervals:

(1) For any meeting of 20 racing days or less, the requisite deposit shall be made not later than
 seven days immediately following the last day of that meeting.

(2) For any meeting of more than 20 racing days, the initial deposit shall be made not later than 27 racing days after the commencement of that meeting and every 20 racing days thereafter, with a final deposit made not later than seven days following the last day of the meeting. The initial deposit for that meeting shall be based upon the applicable amount handled during the first 20 racing days of the meeting and deposits thereafter shall be based upon the applicable amount handled during the ensuing periods of 20 racing days with the last deposit being based upon the applicable amount handled from the end of the last 20-racing-day period for which a deposit has been made to the end of the meeting.

(c) After deducting a sum up to, but not to exceed, 10 percent of the total deposits made pursuant to subdivision (b) and
 the total deposits made pursuant to other provisions of this chapter, including Sections 19612.1 and 19612.2, to compensate the official registering agency for its administrative costs, the official registering agency shall distribute annually the balance of the deposits in the following manner:

(1) Fifty-five percent to the breeder fund from which breeder premiums are to be paid.

(2) Twenty percent to the owner fund from which owners’ awards are to be paid.

(3) Fifteen percent to the stallion fund from which stallion awards are to be paid.

(4) Ten percent to the California-bred race fund to be used for the promotion of California-bred races and programs, which fund shall be administered by the official registering agency. Any funds not so used during
 the year shall augment the owner fund of that year and shall be distributable therefrom. It is the intent of the Legislature that all funds used for purses shall supplement and not supplant existing purses for California-breds.

(d) The official registering agency shall make the following payments to the breeder, owner, and stallion owner to encourage agriculture and the breeding of high quality horses in this state:

(1) The breeder shall be paid a sum based on a prorated share of first and second place earnings.

(2) The owner shall be paid an owners’ award, a sum based on a prorated share of first and second place earnings from qualified races by a California-bred Arabian horse.

(3) The stallion owner shall be paid a stallion award, a sum based on a
 prorated share of first and second place earnings from the Arabian horses who placed first or second in one or more races at a fair meeting, mixed breed meeting, or other type of meeting.

Stallion awards shall not be made to the owner of a sire that has been out of the state for breeding purposes during the calendar year. Stallion awards shall not be made for any race run outside of the State of California.

(4) The breeder premium, and owners’ and stallion awards shall be paid not later than March 31 of the calendar year immediately following the calendar year for which the awards or premiums were earned.

(e) The amount remaining for distribution under this section, if any, after the payments are made under subdivision (d) shall be paid at the end of the year on a prorated percentage basis to the owners of sires of Arabian horses who
 placed first in one or more races at a fair meeting, mixed breed meeting, or other type of meeting.

(f) If there are insufficient funds to make all of the distributions in this section, there shall be no assessments made against any association to fund the deficiencies.

(g) Any award remaining uncollected for one year from the date of disbursement is null and void. The official registering agency shall deposit the amount of the uncollected award into the award fund existing at that time.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 826, Sec. 11.   Effective October 13, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19617.9.

(a) The following definitions govern the construction of this section:

(1) “Breeder” means a person who is registered as the owner of the dam at the time the mare foals.

(2) “Eligible earnings” means the following:

(A) In the case of breeder premiums, the annual amount earned by a California-bred Appaloosa horse for finishing first or second.

(B) In the case of owners’ awards, the annual amount earned by a California-bred Appaloosa horse for finishing first or second in qualifying races.

(C) In the case of stallion awards, the annual amount earned by Appaloosa foals of an eligible Appaloosa sire for finishing first or second.

(D) In order for earnings from a qualifying race to be considered as eligible earnings, an Appaloosa horse shall be registered as such with the official registering agency before the date entries were taken by the association for the qualifying race in which that horse earned purse money.

(E) In determining the purse earned in any race that is a stakes race, the amount earned shall be based solely on the added money, with no consideration given to other sources of the
 purse, such as nomination, entry, or starting fees, bonuses, and sponsor contributions, or any combination thereof.

(F) On or before February 1 of any year, the stallion owner shall advise the official registering agency of any and all purses earned during the preceding year to be considered in determining the amount of the stallion award to which the owner is entitled.

(3) “Eligible Appaloosa sire” means an Appaloosa stallion that was continuously present in this state from February 1 to July 15, inclusive, of the calendar year in which the qualifying race was conducted, and, if the sire left this state after July 15 of the calendar year in which the qualifying race was conducted, the sire returned to and was present in this state by February 1 of the following calendar year and thereafter remained until July 15 of that year. If a sire dies in this state and stood his last season
 at stud in this state, he shall thereafter continue to be considered an eligible Appaloosa sire. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an Appaloosa stallion shall be considered an eligible Appaloosa sire only if its owner has registered the stallion with the official registering agency for stallion awards on or before February 1 of the calendar year immediately following the calendar year for which the awards are being distributed.

(4) “Official registering agency” means the officially recognized organization representing Appaloosa horsemen designated by the board.

(5) “Owner” means the person who is registered with the paymaster of purses on the date the race was conducted as the owner of the California-bred Appaloosa horse earning purse money in that race.

(6) “Qualifying race” means all Appaloosa horseraces
 in this state for breeders and stallions; for owners’ awards, a qualifying race must be equal to or above four thousand dollars ($4,000) claiming.

(7) “Stallion owner” means the person who is the owner of the eligible Appaloosa sire as of December 31 of the calendar year in which that sire’s foals had eligible earnings or the person who owned the eligible Appaloosa sire on the date that the sire died.

(b) Any association conducting a race meeting that includes Appaloosa horseracing shall deposit with the official registering agency 0.2 of 1 percent of the total amount handled ontrack, and 0.4 of 1 percent of the total amount handled offtrack, in daily conventional and exotic parimutuel pools and a sum equal to 13.33 percent of those funds specified for purses in Section 19612.1, and the sums specified in Sections 19567 and 19617.5, resulting from Appaloosa horseracing. The
 deposits shall be made at the following intervals:

(1) For any meeting of 20 racing days or less, the requisite deposit shall be made not later than seven days immediately following the last day of that meeting.

(2) For any meeting of more than 20 racing days, the initial deposit shall be made not later than 27 racing days after the commencement of that meeting and every 20 racing days thereafter, with a final deposit made not later than seven days following the last day of that meeting. The initial deposit for that meeting shall be based upon the applicable amount handled during the first 20 racing days of the meeting and deposits thereafter shall be based upon the applicable amount handled during the ensuing periods of 20 racing days with the last deposit based upon the applicable amount handled from the end of the last 20-racing-day period for which a deposit has been made to
 the end of the meeting.

(c) After deducting a sum up to, but not to exceed, 10 percent of the total deposits made pursuant to subdivision (b) and the total deposits made pursuant to other provisions of this chapter, including Sections 19612.1 and 19612.2, to compensate the official registering agency for its administrative costs, the official registering agency shall distribute annually the balance of the deposits in the following manner:

(1) Sixty percent to the breeder fund from which breeder premiums are to be paid.

(2) Twenty-five percent to the owner fund from which owners’ awards are to be paid.

(3) Fifteen percent to the stallion fund from which stallion awards are to be paid.

(d) The official registering agency shall make the following payments to the breeder, owner, and stallion owner to encourage agriculture and the breeding of high quality horses in this state:

(1) The breeder shall be paid a sum based on a prorated share of first and second place earnings.

(2) The owner shall be paid an owners’ award, a sum based on a prorated share of first and second place earnings from qualified races by a California-bred Appaloosa horse.

(3) The stallion owner shall be paid a stallion award, a sum based on a prorated share of first and second place earnings from Appaloosa horses who placed first or second in one or more races at a fair meeting or a mixed breed meeting.

Stallion awards shall not be made to the owner of a sire that has been out
 of the state for breeding purposes during the calendar year. Stallion awards shall not be made for any race run outside the State of California.

(4) The breeder premium, and owners’ and stallion awards shall be paid not later than March 31 of the calendar year immediately following the calendar year for which the awards or premiums were earned.

(e) If there are insufficient funds to make all of the distributions in this section, there shall be no assessments made against any association to fund the deficiencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 6, Sec. 2.   Effective May 23, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19618.

(a) Except as provided in Article 9.2 (commencing with Section 19605), no person licensed under this chapter to conduct a racing meeting shall pay or distribute to, or on behalf of, any horse owner, any agent, or person or organization representing any horse owner or owners, purses, or any other type of consideration to, or for, the benefit of horsemen, other than that expressly provided in this chapter.

(b) Except as provided in Article 9.2 (commencing with Section 19605), no
 horse owner, any agent, or person or organization representing any horse owner or owners, shall receive, solicit, or obtain from any person licensed under this chapter to conduct a race meeting, purses, or any other type of consideration to, or for, the benefit of horsemen, other than that expressly provided in this chapter.

(c) No plaque, cup, tray, ribbon, trophy, or similar award given in recognition of achievement or special event is deemed to be consideration for the purpose of subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to any payment by an association in connection with any match race or special racing event.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or (b), or any other provision of law, the horsemen’s organization that represents the horsemen participating in a racing meeting and a licensed
 racing association may enter into an agreement which provides for the division of, and sharing by the organization and the association of, the interest earned on the association’s paymaster accounts during racing meetings conducted prior to, during, or subsequent to, 1990, if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The agreement is filed with the board.

(2) The share of earned interest allocated to the horsemen’s organization is used exclusively for the benefit of horsemen, including, among other purposes, purses.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or (b), or any other provision of law, the horsemen’s organization that represents the horsemen participating in a racing meeting and a licensed racing association may enter into an agreement that provides for the supplementing of purses due to the impact, if
 any, of activities regulated pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 19800) that are conducted on the association’s property during a race meeting, if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The agreement is approved by the board.

(2) Any sum agreed to pursuant to this subdivision is used exclusively to supplement purses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 127, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

19618.1.

Subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 19618 shall not apply to any payment by a licensed harness racing association in the northern zone, or by any fair, in connection with promotional contests or sponsorship contributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 127, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

19618.2.

Subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 19618 shall not apply to either of the following:

(a) Any payment by a licensed quarter horse racing association in the southern zone, to horsemen participating in its race meeting.

(b) Any payment by a licensed thoroughbred racing association in connection with funds contributed or authorized by the horsemen’s organization responsible for negotiating purse agreements on behalf of the horsemen
 participating in the racing meeting, including purse supplements, sponsorship contributions, or promotional funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 75, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19619.

(a) Since the purpose of this chapter is to encourage agriculture and the breeding of horses in this state, a California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program is hereby established for standardbred horses bred in the State of California.

(b) Horses eligible to race in the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program shall be the offspring of a registered California standardbred stallion standing in California during an entire breeding season, or the offspring of a registered standardbred stallion standing in Iowa, Maine, Michigan, Minnesota, or Wisconsin, or the Province of Alberta, Canada.

(c) (1) Responsibility for the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program is with the board.
 Administration of the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program is the responsibility of the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Committee. The committee shall consist of five members and one alternate selected from and by the California Harness Horsemen’s Association.

(2) Administrative expenses of the committee in any given year shall not exceed 4 percent of that year’s income to the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program, and all expenses shall be approved by the board.

(d) The board may do all that is necessary to ensure that the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program is appropriately administered and shall prepare, issue, and adopt rules and regulations providing for all of the following:

(1) Classes and divisions of races, eligibility of horses and owners therefor, and prizes and awards to be
 awarded.

(2) Nominating, sustaining, and entry fees for horses and races.

(3) Registration and certification of California stallions, mares bred to those stallions, and foals produced thereby.

(4) Any other matter that is considered to be necessary and appropriate for the proper administration and implementation of the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program.

(e) The funds for the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program made available pursuant to Section 19491.7 and the nominating, sustaining, and entry fees provided for in this section shall be deposited with the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Committee. The committee shall distribute the funds deposited with it in accordance with this section for the purposes of the program in the
 manner approved by the board.

(f) Pursuant to Section 19491.7, the breakage used to fund the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program and to increase purses shall be divided in accordance with the following criteria:California StandardbredSires Stakes ProgramPurses197710%90% 197820%80% 197925%75% 198050%50% January 1 to June 30, 198175%25% July 1, 1981, and thereafter100%0% (g) An amount equal to 10